Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 62 The Rhode Island Student Loan Authority
16-62-22.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.